Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.485

Amendments to charter required in application—Articles of incorporation—Filing of certificate required—Contents—Issuance and filing of authorization certificate.

(1) An application for conversion under this chapter shall include amendments to the charter of the converting savings bank. The charter of the converted savings bank, as amended, shall be known after the conversion as the articles of incorporation of the converted savings bank. The articles of incorporation may limit or permit the preemptive rights of a shareholder to acquire unissued shares of the converted savings bank and may thereafter by amendment limit, deny, or grant to shareholders of any class of stock or of any series of preferred stock the preemptive right to acquire additional shares of the converted savings bank whether then or thereafter authorized. The articles of incorporation may establish or may specify procedures, in accordance with *RCW 30.08.083, for the division of a class of preferred stock into series. In addition to such provisions and the provisions permitted pursuant to RCW 23B.17.030, the articles of incorporation shall contain such other provisions not inconsistent with this chapter as the board of directors of the converting savings bank may determine and as shall be approved by the director of financial institutions.

(2) When all of the stock of a converting savings bank has been subscribed for in accordance with the plan and any amendments thereto, the board of trustees shall thereupon issue the stock and shall cause to be filed with the director of financial institutions, in triplicate, a certificate subscribed by the persons who are to be directors of the converted savings bank, stating:

(a) That all of the stock of the converted mutual savings bank has been issued;

(b) That the attached articles of incorporation have been executed by all of the persons who are to be directors of the converted mutual savings bank;

(c) The place where the bank is to be located and its business transacted, naming the city or town and county, which city or town shall be the same as that where the principal place of business of the mutual savings bank has theretofore been located;

(d) The name, occupation, residence, and post office address of each signer of the certificate; and

(e) The amount of the assets of the mutual savings bank, the amount of its liabilities, and the amount of its guaranty fund and nondivided profits as of the first day of the current calendar month.

(3) Upon the filing of the certificate in triplicate, the director of financial institutions shall, within thirty days thereafter, if satisfied that the corporation has complied with all the provisions of this chapter, issue in triplicate an authorization certificate stating that the corporation has complied with all the requirements of law, and that it has authority to transact at the place designated in its articles of incorporation the business of a converted mutual savings bank. One of the director of financial institutions' certificates of authorization shall be attached to each of the articles of incorporation, and one set of these shall be filed and retained by the director of financial institutions, one set shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, and one set shall be transmitted to the bank for its files. Upon the receipt from the corporation of the same fees as are required for filing and recording other incorporation certificates or articles the secretary of state shall record the same; whereupon the conversion of the mutual savings bank shall be deemed complete, the requirements of RCW 32.08.010 relating to the incorporation certificate of an unconverted mutual savings bank shall no longer apply, and the signers of the articles of incorporation and their successors shall be a corporation having the powers and being subject to the duties and obligations prescribed by the laws of this state applicable to converted mutual savings banks, and the time of existence of the corporation shall be perpetual, unless terminated pursuant to law.

[ 1994 c 256 s 108; 1994 c 92 s 401; 1981 c 85 s 96.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 30.08.083 was recodified as RCW 30A.08.083 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

(2) This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 401 and by 1994 c 256 s 108, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.